RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.dic
abejutiļæ½kas/ANQ
adekvatus/AMNQ
aidingas/ANQ
aistrus/ANQ
akiplļæ½ļæ½iļæ½kas/ANQ
aklas/ANQ
akrobatiļæ½kas/ANQ
alavingas/ANQ
alyvuotas/ANQ
alternatyvus/AQ
ambulatoriļæ½kas/ANQ
analitiļæ½kas/ANQ
angliuotas/ANQ
ankstybas/ANQ
anonimiļæ½kas/ANQ
antiļæ½kas/ANQ
apatiļæ½kas/ANQ
apgaulingas/ANQ
apyvartus/ANQ
aplamas/ANQ
apļæ½nekus/ANQ
apveidus/ANQ
arabiļæ½kas/ANQ
aromatingas/ANQ
aļæ½arotas/ANQ
asmeniļæ½kas/ANQ
aļæ½tuonlinkas/ANQ
atgaivingas/ANQ
atidus/ANQ
atkilus/ANQ
atletiļæ½kas/ANQ
atokus/ANQ
atsakingas/ANQ
atskalļæ½niļæ½kas/ANQ
atspļæ½jamas/ANQ
atvirkļæ½ļæ½ias/ANQ
audrus/ANQ
aukļæ½taitiļæ½kas/ANQ
ausytas/ANQ
avaringas/ANQ
baisingas/ANQ
balsingas/ANQ
baltokas/ANQ
barnus/ANQ
batuotas/ANQ
bļæ½dinas/ANQ
bejļæ½giļæ½kas/ANQ
bergļæ½dļæ½ias/ANQ
beskoniļæ½kas/ANQ
beviltiļæ½kas/ANQ
bjaurus/ANQ
blandus/ANQ
blukus/ANQ
brandus/ANQ
brizgus/ANQ
bruzdus/ANQ
bukas/ADNQ
ļæ½aiļæ½us/ANQ
chemiļæ½kas/ANQ
cinkuotas/ANQ
cukrinas/ANQ
daigus/ANQ
dainingas/ANQ
dalus/ANQ
darbļæ½tus/ANQ
dargus/ANQ
daugeriopas/ANQ
daļæ½nokas/ANQ
defektyvus/ANQ
deklaratyvus/ANQ
demokratiļæ½kas/ANQ
dervotas/ANQ
dļæ½slus/ANQ
devyneriopas/ANQ
diametralus/ANQ
dieninga/ANQ
dilus/ANQ
dirsļæ½tas/ANQ
dygliuotas/ANQ
dokumentalus/ANQ
dorovingas/ANQ
draiskaliuotas/ANQ
drļæ½sokas/ANQ
draugus/ANQ
drļæ½gnokas/ANQ
dryļæ½uotas/ANQ
drugiļæ½kas/ANQ
druskļæ½tas/ANQ
drļæ½tokas/ANQ
dukslus/ANQ
dulsvas/ANQ
duobļæ½tas/ANQ
duoslus/ANQ
dusulingas/ANQ
dvazgus/ANQ
dviprasmiļæ½kas/ANQ
dļæ½iaugsmingas/ANQ
dzļæ½kiļæ½kas/ANQ
efemeriļæ½kas/ANQ
eikvus/ANQ
ekologiļæ½kas/ANQ
eksteritorialus/ANQ
ekvivalentus/ANQ
elementarus/ANQ
energingas/ANQ
erdvas/ANQ
erotiļæ½kas/ANQ
estetiļæ½kas/ANQ
eļæ½eruotas/ANQ
fanatiļæ½kas/ANQ
fiktyvus/ANQ
fiziļæ½kas/ANQ
fragmentiļæ½kas/ANQ
gailus/ANQ
gaisrus/ANQ
gaiļæ½us/ANQ
galionuotas/ANQ
ganļæ½tinas/ANQ
garbingas/ANQ
garsingas/ANQ
gļæ½stus/ANQ
gausokas/ANQ
geidulingas/ANQ
gļæ½las/ANQ
geluoniuotas/ANQ
geradariļæ½kas/ANQ
gerokas/ANQ
giminingas/ANQ
gintaringas/ANQ
girtas/ANQ
gyvatiļæ½kas/ANQ
glamļæ½us/ANQ
glebus/ANQ
glodus/ANQ
gnaibus/ANQ
gobļæ½us/ANQ
gracingas/ANQ
graikļæ½tus/ANQ
grasus/ANQ
greblas/ANQ
grļæ½smingas/ANQ
grimzlus/ANQ
griuvus/ANQ
grobuoniļæ½kas/ANQ
grļæ½dļæ½tas/ANQ
gruziniļæ½kas/ANQ
gļæ½dus/ANQ
gurus/ANQ
hermetiļæ½kas/ANQ
horizontalus/ANQ
identiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½geidus/ANQ
ļæ½kampus/ANQ
ļæ½kļæ½nus/ANQ
ilgesingas/ANQ
ilsus/ANQ
imlus/ANQ
induktyvus/ANQ
iniciatyvinis/BQ
integralus/ANQ
interaktyvus/ANQ
ļæ½prastas/ANQ
ļæ½sakus/ANQ
iļæ½daigus/ANQ
iļæ½ganus/ANQ
ļæ½ļæ½irdus/ANQ
iļæ½kilmingas/ANQ
iļæ½krikas/ANQ
iļæ½manus/ANQ
ispaniļæ½kas/AQ
iļæ½rankus/ANQ
iļæ½taigus/ANQ
ļæ½statymiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½striļæ½as/ANQ
iļæ½ļæ½aras/ANQ
ļæ½taikus/ANQ
ļæ½tarus/ANQ
ļæ½vairiapusiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½vardiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½ļæ½ulnus/ANQ
ypatingas/ANQ
jaukus/ANQ
jausmingas/ANQ
jukus/ANQ
juodbļæ½ras/ANQ
juozganas/ANQ
juslingas/ANQ
kaimiļæ½kas/ANQ
kaitrus/ANQ
kalbus/ANQ
kalnuotas/ANQ
kalus/ANQ
kamblingas/ANQ
kanapļæ½tas/ANQ
kanoniļæ½kas/ANQ
kaprizingas/ANQ
karoliuotas/ANQ
karļæ½tligiļæ½kas/ANQ
karļæ½ygiļæ½kas/ANQ
kauburiuotas/ANQ
kaupinas/ANQ
keistas/ANQ
keleiviļæ½kas/ANQ
kelmuotas/ANQ
kenksmingas/ANQ
kerotas/ANQ
keterotas/ANQ
keturnytas/ANQ
kiauras/ANQ
kiesvas/ANQ
kilniadvasiļæ½kas/ANQ
kiminuotas/ANQ
kirmļæ½liuotas/ANQ
kivirļæ½nus/ANQ
klajokliļæ½kas/ANQ
klegus/ANQ
kliautingas/ANQ
klintingas/ANQ
klumpļæ½tas/ANQ
knapus/ANQ
knislus/ANQ
kolegialus/ANQ
komiļæ½kas/ANQ
komplikuotas/ANQ
konkurencingas/ANQ
kontrastingas/ANQ
korļæ½tas/ANQ
koļæ½mariļæ½kas/AQ
krakmolingas/ANQ
kraugeriļæ½kas/ANQ
kreidingas/ANQ
kremzlļæ½tas/ANQ
krikļæ½ļæ½ioniļæ½kas/ANQ
kryļæ½mas/ANQ
krumpliuotas/ANQ
krutus/ANQ
kļæ½lļæ½tas/ANQ
kumelinga/ANQ
kuokļæ½tiļæ½kas/ANQ
kļæ½rybingas/ANQ
kurtokas/ANQ
kvaiļæ½as/ANQ
labas/ADNQ
laidus/ANQ
laipsniļæ½kas/ANQ
laisvas/ANQ
lakoniļæ½kas/ANQ
lamstuotas/ANQ
laļæ½inļæ½tas/ANQ
laukas/ADNQ
ledinuotas/ANQ
leinas/ANQ
lengvapļæ½diļæ½kas/ANQ
lepus/ANQ
liaudiļæ½kas/ANQ
liemeningas/ANQ
liesokas/ANQ
liguistas/ANQ
linksmokas/ANQ
literatļæ½riļæ½kas/ANQ
liļæ½tingas/ANQ
lygmalas/ANQ
lobingas/ANQ
lokalus/ANQ
lukļæ½as/ANQ
lupus/ANQ
mainus/ANQ
maknotas/ANQ
malonus/ANQ
manieringas/ANQ
marguliuotas/ANQ
marļæ½us/ANQ
masyvus/ANQ
matus/ANQ
maļæ½araļæ½tiļæ½kas/ANQ
mechaniļæ½kas/ANQ
medļæ½iokliļæ½kas/ANQ
meilingas/ANQ
melancholiļæ½kas/ANQ
melodramiļæ½kas/ANQ
menkas/ANQ
meļæ½kiļæ½kas/ANQ
metaforiļæ½kas/ANQ
mezginiuotas/ANQ
mielļæ½tas/ANQ
miestiļæ½kas/ANQ
miltinas/ANQ
minimalus/ANQ
minkļæ½tokas/ANQ
miļæ½kingas/ANQ
miļæ½rus/ANQ
modernus/ANQ
moksliļæ½kas/ANQ
molinas/ANQ
monotoniļæ½kas/ANQ
mudrus/ANQ
mulkiļæ½kas/ANQ
mļæ½siļæ½kas/ANQ
muzikalus/ANQ
naikus/ANQ
narsingas/ANQ
narus/ANQ
naujokas/ADNQ
neapsakomas/ANQ
neblogas/ANQ
nedrļæ½sus/ANQ
neļæ½galus/AQ
neļæ½tikimas/ANQ
nekaltas/ANQ
nelieļæ½iamas/ANQ
nemirļæ½tamas/ANQ
nendrļæ½tas/ANQ
nepagydomas/ANQ
nepaprastas/ANQ
nepriklausomas/ANQ
nervingas/ANQ
nesvarus/ANQ
neurotoksiļæ½kas/ANQ
neļæ½moniļæ½kas/ANQ
niekļæ½iļæ½kas/ANQ
nirļæ½us/ANQ
niurgzlus/ANQ
nykus/ANQ
normatyvus/AQ
numaningas/ANQ
nuodarbus/ANQ
nuogandus/ANQ
nuokalnus/ANQ
nuolinkas/ANQ
nuosaulus/ANQ
nuostolingas/ANQ
nuotakus/ANQ
nuoļæ½valgus/ANQ
obuoliuotas/ANQ
operatyvus/ANQ
oranļæ½inis/BNQ
oringas/ANQ
pabiras/ANQ
padorus/ANQ
pagaulus/ANQ
pagieļæ½us/ANQ
pagrindus/ANQ
pailgokas/ANQ
paļæ½striļæ½as/ANQ
pakalnus/ANQ
pakasus/ANQ
paklausus/ANQ
pakulotas/ANQ
palļæ½as/ANQ
pamatuotas/ANQ
panaļæ½us/ANQ
paradoksalus/ANQ
paranormalus/ANQ
paryļæ½ietiļæ½kas/AQ
parļæ½pinamas/ANQ
pasalus/ANQ
pasļæ½dus/ANQ
pasigailļæ½tinas/ANQ
paskiausias/ANQ
paskuļæ½iausias/ANQ
paslaugus/ANQ
pastaras/ANQ
patenkinamas/ANQ
patinkamas/ANQ
patrauklus/ANQ
pavaizdus/ANQ
paveikus/ANQ
pavirļæ½utiniļæ½kas/ANQ
pavojingas/ANQ
paļæ½ulnus/ANQ
pelļæ½diļæ½kas/ANQ
pelningas/ANQ
penkialinkas/ANQ
perkļæ½niļæ½kas/ANQ
pesimistiļæ½kas/ANQ
pigus/ANQ
pilietiļæ½kas/ANQ
piratiļæ½kas/ANQ
pjļæ½kliļæ½kas/ANQ
plauļæ½ingas/ANQ
plitus/ANQ
plļæ½drus/ANQ
poniļæ½kas/ANQ
prabangus/ANQ
prakilas/ANQ
pranaļæ½us/ANQ
praļæ½us/ANQ
prekingas/ANQ
priekabus/ANQ
prieļæ½iļæ½kas/ANQ
prigimtas/ANQ
prisitaikļæ½liļæ½kas/ANQ
produktyvus/ANQ
protestantiļæ½kas/ANQ
pļæ½gingas/ANQ
punktualus/ANQ
pusiausviras/ANQ
putrinas/ANQ
raidiļæ½kas/ANQ
raizgus/ANQ
rantuotas/ANQ
raukiniuotas/ANQ
reakcingas/ANQ
reikiamas/ANQ
religingas/ANQ
retas/ANQ
riebaluotas/ANQ
riļæ½lus/ANQ
ryļæ½kus/ANQ
roļæ½ļæ½tas/ANQ
rļæ½kuotas/ANQ
rļæ½ļæ½ingas/ANQ
ļæ½abloniļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½aknļæ½tas/ANQ
saldus/ANQ
ļæ½altokas/ANQ
sankibus/ANQ
ļæ½armingas/ANQ
saulļæ½tas/ANQ
savanaudiļæ½kas/ANQ
saviļæ½kas/ANQ
savotiļæ½kas/ANQ
sļæ½kmingas/ANQ
senberniļæ½kas/ANQ
sergalingas/ANQ
ļæ½eļæ½ialinkas/ANQ
siauraprotiļæ½kas/ANQ
sibiriļæ½kas/ANQ
silkinas/ANQ
ļæ½ilumingas/ANQ
sintetiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½iukļæ½lļæ½tas/ANQ
siutingas/ANQ
skalsļæ½tas/ANQ
skardus/ANQ
skļæ½stas/ANQ
skylļæ½tas/ANQ
skolingas/ANQ
skruzdļæ½lļæ½tas/ANQ
ļæ½lakuotas/ANQ
ļæ½leikļæ½tus/ANQ
slidokas/ANQ
ļæ½lovingas/ANQ
smalstus/ANQ
smļæ½lingas/ANQ
smuklus/ANQ
snargliuotas/ANQ
snļæ½dus/ANQ
sopuliuotas/ANQ
spartus/ANQ
spygliļæ½kas/ANQ
sprangus/ANQ
sraigtiļæ½kas/ANQ
srutinas/ANQ
stambokas/ANQ
status/ANQ
stiprokas/ANQ
strazdanotas/ANQ
sudļæ½tingas/ANQ
sļæ½kuriuotas/ANQ
ļæ½uoliļæ½kas/ANQ
sustumtas/ANQ
svaigus/ANQ
ļæ½vediļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½ventas/ANQ
ļæ½viesokas/ANQ
taikingas/ANQ
tamprus/ANQ
tapatus/ANQ
tarpus/ANQ
taviļæ½kas/ANQ
teisus/ANQ
teoriļæ½kas/ANQ
tļæ½viļæ½kas/ANQ
tikras/ANQ
tipizuotas/ANQ
tylus/ANQ
tolokas/ANQ
trapus/ANQ
trenksmingas/ANQ
triukļæ½mingas/ANQ
trukus/ANQ
tļæ½kstanteriopas/ANQ
turtingas/ANQ
tvarus/ANQ
tvyrus/ANQ
ļæ½mus/ANQ
uogingas/ANQ
upingas/ANQ
utļæ½liuotas/ANQ
uļæ½kampus/ANQ
vadaksniuotas/ANQ
vaikiļæ½kas/ANQ
vaiļæ½us/ANQ
valdoviļæ½kas/ANQ
valkstus/ANQ
vangus/ANQ
variuotas/ANQ
varus/ANQ
veblas/ANQ
veiksmingas/ANQ
velļæ½nuotas/ANQ
veltļæ½diļæ½kas/ANQ
verpetingas/ANQ
versmingas/ANQ
veļæ½us/ANQ
viduramļæ½iļæ½kas/ANQ
vienaspalviļæ½kas/ANQ
vienprasmiļæ½kas/ANQ
vikļæ½tas/ANQ
vilnotas/ANQ
virbiļæ½kas/ANQ
visavaldiļæ½kas/ANQ
vizualus/ANQ
vmesuliļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½abalas/ANQ
ļæ½alas/ANQ
ļæ½andingas/ANQ
ļæ½elmenuotas/ANQ
ļæ½enklus/ANQ
ļæ½iemiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½inomas/ANQ
ļæ½ymus/ANQ
ļæ½odyniļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½vaigļæ½dļæ½tas/ANQ
ļæ½vļæ½riļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½vyrinas/ANQ
